Hawaii statutes.
§166E-6 Rules. The board shall adopt
rules pursuant to chapter 91, including eligibility requirements for each
disposition and applicant qualifications, to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter. [L 2003, c 90, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 157, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next